Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.042

State fossil.

The Columbian mammoth of North America, Mammuthus columbi, is hereby designated as the official fossil of the state of Washington.

[ 1998 c 129 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—1998 c 129: "The legislature recognizes that the large, hairy prehistoric elephants of the extinct genus Mammuthus roamed the North American continent, including the Pacific Northwest, during the Pleistocene epoch (ice ages)." [ 1998 c 129 s 1.]